Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,224
Forcible entry and detainer; failure of defendant to appear; effect.

If the defendant does not appear in response to the summons, and it shall have been properly served, the court shall try the cause as though he were present.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 123, p. 310;

C.S.1929, § 22-1207;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,124;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 74;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-574.